Maryland, session 2026, SB0826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
2.5–109.
(a) In this section, “economic development program” means:
(4) each of the tax credit programs administered by the Department,
including:
(vii) the [Innovation Investment Incentive] ANGEL INVESTOR Tax
Credit;
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
79. the [Innovation Investment] ANGEL INVESTOR TAX
CREDIT RESERVE Fund;
Article – Tax – General

SENATE BILL 826 3
10–733.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “COMPANY” MEANS ANY ENTITY OF ANY FORM DULY
ORGANIZED AND EXISTING UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY JURISDICTION FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING BUSINESS FOR PROFIT.
(II) “COMPANY” INCLUDES AN ENTITY THAT BECOMES DULY
ORGANIZED AND EXISTING UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY JURISDICTION FOR THE
PURPOSE OF CONDUCTING BUSINESS FOR PROFIT WITHIN 4 MONTHS OF RECEIVING
A QUALIFIED INVESTMENT.
(3) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE.
(4) “EMERGENT TECHNOLOGY” MEANS ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE,
QUANTUM COMPUTING, OR CYBERSECURITY.
(5) (I) “INVESTMENT” MEANS THE CONTRIBUTION OF MONEY IN
CASH OR CASH EQUIVALENTS EXPRESSED IN UNITED STATES DOLLARS, AT A RISK
OF LOSS, TO A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY IN EXCHANGE FOR STOCK, A
PARTNERSHIP OR MEMBERSHIP INTEREST, OR ANY OTHER OWNERSHIP INTEREST
IN THE EQUITY OF THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, TITLE TO WHICH
OWNERSHIP INTEREST SHALL VEST IN THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR.
(II) “INVESTMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE DEBT UNLESS IT IS
CONVERTIBLE DEBT.
(III) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, AN INVESTMENT IS AT
RISK OF LOSS WHEN REPAYMENT ENTIRELY DEPENDS ON THE SUCCESS OF THE
BUSINESS OPERATIONS OF THE COMPANY.
(6) (I) “QUALIFIED INVESTOR” MEANS ANY INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY
THAT, BEFORE JULY 1, 2029, INVESTS AT LEAST $25,000 IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND
COMPANY AND THAT IS REQUIRED TO FILE AN INCOME TAX RETURN IN ANY
JURISDICTION.
(II) “QUALIFIED INVESTOR” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A VENTURE CAPITAL BUSINESS, BANK, BANK AND
TRUST, INSURANCE, TRUST, OR SAVINGS ASSOCIATION OR BUILDING AND LOAN
ASSOCIATION;

SENATE BILL 826
2. A QUALIFIED PENSION PLAN, AN INDIVIDUAL
RETIREMENT ACCOUNT, OR ANY OTHER QUALIFIED RETIREMENT PLAN UNDER THE
EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT INCOME SECURITY ACT OF 1974 OR FIDUCIARIES OR
CUSTODIANS UNDER SUCH PLANS, OR SIMILAR TAX–FAVORED PLANS OR ENTITIES
UNDER THE LAWS OF OTHER COUNTRIES; OR
3. A FOUNDER OR CURRENT EMPLOYEE OF THE
QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, IF THE COMPANY HAS BEEN IN ACTIVE BUSINESS
FOR MORE THAN 7 YEARS.
(7) “QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY” MEANS A COMPANY THAT HAS
MET THE CRITERIA IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(8) “RESERVE FUND” MEANS THE ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT
RESERVE FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(9) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE.
(B) (1) THERE IS AN ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT.
(2) THE ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT IS INTENDED TO FOSTER THE
GROWTH OF THE STATE’S EMERGENT TECHNOLOGY BY INCENTIVIZING INVESTMENT
IN EARLY–STAGE COMPANIES OR SMALL BUSINESSES THAT ARE EXPANDING.
(3) THE GOAL OF THE ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT IS TO
INCREASE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF COMPANIES DEVELOPING IN MARYLAND;
(II) THE OVERALL INVESTMENTS IN EMERGENT
TECHNOLOGIES; AND
(III) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUAL INVESTORS ACTIVELY
INVESTING IN MARYLAND COMPANIES.
(4) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (C), (D), AND (E) OF THIS SECTION,
FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH AN INVESTMENT IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND
COMPANY IS MADE, A QUALIFIED INVESTOR MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE
STATE INCOME TAX IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT STATED IN THE FINAL
CREDIT CERTIFICATE APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY FOR THE INVESTMENT AS
PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 826 5
(C) (1) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR THE ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT UNDER
THIS SECTION, THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR:
(I) MAY NOT, AFTER MAKING THE PROPOSED INVESTMENT,
OWN OR CONTROL MORE THAN 50% OF THE EQUITY INTERESTS IN THE QUALIFIED
MARYLAND COMPANY IN WHICH THE INVESTMENT IS MADE; AND
(II) AT LEAST 30 DAYS PRIOR TO MAKING AN INVESTMENT IN A
QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, SHALL SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE
DEPARTMENT CONTAINING THE FOLLOWING:
1. EVIDENCE THAT THE INVESTOR IS:
A. IF A COMPANY, DULY ORGANIZED AND IN GOOD
STANDING IN THE JURISDICTION UNDER THE LAWS UNDER WHICH IT IS ORGANIZED;
B. CURRENT IN THE PAYMENT OF ALL TAX OBLIGATIONS
TO A STATE OR ANY UNIT OR SUBDIVISION OF A STATE; AND
C. NOT IN DEFAULT UNDER THE TERMS OF ANY
CONTRACT WITH, INDEBTEDNESS TO, OR GRANT FROM A STATE OR ANY UNIT OR
SUBDIVISION OF A STATE;
2. EVIDENCE THAT THE COMPANY HAS BEEN APPROVED
BY THE DEPARTMENT AS A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY UNDER PARAGRAPH
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
3. ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT MAY
REQUIRE.
(2) (I) 1. TO BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE QUALIFIED
INVESTMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION, A COMPANY MAY APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT
TO BE APPROVED AS A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY.
2. THE APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
A. A COPY OF THE COMPANY’S ORGANIZATIONAL
DOCUMENTS;
B. A BUSINESS PLAN, INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF THE
COMPANY AND THE MANAGEMENT, PRODUCT, MARKET, AND FINANCIAL PLAN;

SENATE BILL 826
C. A DESCRIPTION OF THE COMPANY’S TECHNOLOGY,
PRODUCT, OR SERVICE;
D. A STATEMENT OF THE POTENTIAL ECONOMIC IMPACT
OF THE COMPANY, INCLUDING THE NUMBER, LOCATION, AND TYPES OF JOBS
EXPECTED TO BE CREATED;
E. A DESCRIPTION OF THE TYPE OF OWNERSHIP TO BE
ISSUED FOR A QUALIFIED INVESTMENT;
F. A STATEMENT OF THE TIMING AND PROJECTED USE
OF A QUALIFIED INVESTMENT; AND
G. ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, TO BE APPROVED AS A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, THE
COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE EVIDENCE TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT THE COMPANY:
1. HAS ITS HEADQUARTERS AND BASE OF OPERATIONS
IN THE STATE;
2. HAS OPERATED IN THE STATE FOR NOT MORE THAN 7
YEARS;
3. HAS RECEIVED LESS THAN $2,000,000 IN
INVESTMENTS MADE BY A QUALIFIED INVESTOR;
4. HAD ANNUAL GROSS REVENUES OF LESS THAN
$20,000,000 IN THE MOST RECENT YEAR OF OPERATION;
5. HAS FEWER THAN 25 FULL–TIME EMPLOYEES;
6. IS PRIMARILY OWNED BY THE MANAGEMENT OF THE
COMPANY AND THEIR FAMILIES;
7. IS IN GOOD STANDING;
8. IS CURRENT IN THE PAYMENT OF ALL TAX
OBLIGATIONS TO THE STATE OR ANY UNIT OR SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;

SENATE BILL 826 7
9. IS NOT IN DEFAULT UNDER THE TERMS OF ANY
CONTRACT WITH, INDEBTEDNESS TO, OR GRANT FROM THE STATE OR ANY UNIT OR
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE; AND
10. ENGAGES IN ONE OR MORE EMERGENT TECHNOLOGY.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II)2, 3, OR 4 OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN THE CASE OF A COMPANY
THAT HAS OPERATED IN THE STATE FOR MORE THAN 7 YEARS BUT IS NEWLY
EXPANDING ITS OPERATIONS TO INCLUDE EMERGENT TECHNOLOGY.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR REVIEWING
AND APPROVING APPLICATIONS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
APPROVE ALL APPLICATIONS THAT QUALIFY FOR TAX CREDITS UNDER THIS
SECTION ON A FIRST–COME, FIRST–SERVED BASIS; AND
(II) WITHIN 30 CALENDAR DAYS OF RECEIPT OF AN
APPLICATION:
1. CERTIFY THE AMOUNT OF ANY APPROVED TAX
CREDITS TO A QUALIFIED INVESTOR; AND
2. DETERMINE WHETHER A COMPANY QUALIFIES FOR
INVESTMENTS THAT ARE ELIGIBLE FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL AWARD CREDITS IN THE FOLLOWING
PROPORTIONS:
(I) 50% OF THE AMOUNT IN THE RESERVE FUND TO QUALIFIED
INVESTORS THAT INVESTED IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY THAT HAS BEEN
IN BUSINESS FOR LESS THAN 7 YEARS; AND
(II) 50% OF THE AMOUNT IN THE RESERVE FUND TO QUALIFIED
INVESTORS THAT INVESTED IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY THAT IS
EXPANDING ITS OPERATIONS TO INCLUDE EMERGENT TECHNOLOGY.
(3) (I) AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE DEPARTMENT ISSUES AN
INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SECTION, A QUALIFIED INVESTOR

SENATE BILL 826
SHALL HAVE 30 CALENDAR DAYS TO MAKE AN INVESTMENT IN A QUALIFIED
MARYLAND COMPANY.
(II) WITHIN 10 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH A
QUALIFIED INVESTOR MAKES THE INVESTMENT, THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR SHALL
PROVIDE TO THE DEPARTMENT NOTICE AND PROOF OF THE MAKING OF THE
INVESTMENT, INCLUDING:
1. THE DATE OF THE INVESTMENT;
2. THE AMOUNT INVESTED;
3. PROOF OF THE RECEIPT OF THE INVESTED FUNDS BY
THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY;
4. A COMPLETE DESCRIPTION OF THE NATURE OF THE
OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE EQUITY OF THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY
ACQUIRED IN CONSIDERATION OF THE INVESTMENT; AND
5. ANY REASONABLE SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION
THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE.
(III) IF A QUALIFIED INVESTOR DOES NOT PROVIDE THE NOTICE
AND PROOF OF THE MAKING OF THE INVESTMENT REQUIRED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH WITHIN 40 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
DEPARTMENT ISSUES AN INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE UNDER THIS SECTION:
1. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RESCIND THE INITIAL TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATE; AND
2. THE CREDIT AMOUNT ALLOCATED TO THE RESCINDED
CERTIFICATE SHALL REVERT TO THE RESERVE FUND AND SHALL BE AVAILABLE IN
THE APPLICABLE FISCAL YEAR FOR ALLOCATION BY THE DEPARTMENT TO OTHER
INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SECTION.
(E) (1) THE TAX CREDIT ALLOWED IN AN INITIAL TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IS 25% OF THE INVESTMENT IN A
QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, NOT TO EXCEED $1,000,000.
(2) IF THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR THAT RECEIVES A TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION:

SENATE BILL 826 9
(I) IS AN S CORPORATION, THE TAX CREDIT MAY BE CLAIMED
BY THE SHAREHOLDERS OR PARTNERS OF THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR; OR
(II) IS A SINGLE MEMBER LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, THE
TAX CREDIT MAY BE CLAIMED BY THE OWNER.
(3) DURING ANY FISCAL YEAR, THE SECRETARY MAY NOT CERTIFY
TAX CREDITS FOR INVESTMENTS IN A SINGLE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY
THAT IN THE AGGREGATE EXCEED 15% OF THE TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS TO THE
RESERVE FUND FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR.
(4) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE
YEAR EXCEEDS THE STATE INCOME TAX FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, ANY UNUSED
CREDIT MAY BE CARRIED FORWARD AND APPLIED FOR SUCCEEDING TAXABLE
YEARS UNTIL THE EARLIER OF:
(I) THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT IS USED; OR
(II) THE EXPIRATION OF THE 5TH YEAR AFTER THE TAXABLE
YEAR FOR WHICH THE CREDIT WAS ALLOWED.
(F) (1) (I) THERE IS AN ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT RESERVE
FUND THAT IS A SPECIAL CONTINUING, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT SUBJECT
TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE MONEY IN THE RESERVE FUND SHALL BE INVESTED
AND REINVESTED BY THE TREASURER, AND INTEREST AND EARNINGS SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE RESERVE FUND.
(III) THE MONEY IN THE RESERVE FUND MAY BE USED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO PAY THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING THE TAX CREDIT PROGRAM
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE AN INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE TO A QUALIFIED
INVESTOR FOR EACH APPROVED INVESTMENT IN A QUALIFIED MARYLAND
COMPANY.
(II) AN INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL STATE THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT FOR WHICH THE
QUALIFIED INVESTOR IS ELIGIBLE.

SENATE BILL 826
(III) 1. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR, THE SECRETARY MAY NOT ISSUE INITIAL
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES FOR CREDIT AMOUNTS IN THE AGGREGATE TOTALING
MORE THAN THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED TO THE RESERVE FUND FOR THAT FISCAL
YEAR IN THE STATE BUDGET AS APPROVED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AS
REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT NEEDED TO PAY THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING THE TAX
CREDIT PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
2. IF THE AGGREGATE CREDIT AMOUNTS UNDER INITIAL
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES ISSUED IN A FISCAL YEAR TOTAL LESS THAN THE
AMOUNT APPROPRIATED TO THE RESERVE FUND FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR, ANY
EXCESS AMOUNT SHALL REMAIN IN THE RESERVE FUND AND MAY BE ISSUED UNDER
INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES FOR THE NEXT FISCAL YEAR.
3. FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR, IF FUNDS ARE TRANSFERRED
FROM THE RESERVE FUND UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF ANY PROVISION OF LAW
OTHER THAN UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MAXIMUM CREDIT
AMOUNTS IN THE AGGREGATE FOR WHICH THE SECRETARY MAY ISSUE INITIAL TAX
CREDIT CERTIFICATES SHALL BE REDUCED BY THE AMOUNT TRANSFERRED.
(IV) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE
IN THE BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $25,000,000 TO THE
RESERVE FUND.
(V) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF § 7–213 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT REDUCE
AN APPROPRIATION TO THE RESERVE FUND IN THE STATE BUDGET AS APPROVED
BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(VI) BASED ON THE ACTUAL AMOUNT OF AN INVESTMENT MADE
BY A QUALIFIED INVESTOR, THE SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE A FINAL TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATE TO THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS PARAGRAPH,
MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE RESERVE FUND SHALL REMAIN IN THE RESERVE
FUND.
(II) 1. WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE END OF EACH CALENDAR
QUARTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE COMPTROLLER AS TO EACH FINAL
CREDIT CERTIFICATE ISSUED DURING THE QUARTER:

SENATE BILL 826 11
A. THE MAXIMUM CREDIT AMOUNT STATED IN THE
INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR THE INVESTMENT IN THE QUALIFIED
MARYLAND COMPANY; AND
B. THE FINAL CERTIFIED CREDIT AMOUNT FOR THE
INVESTMENT IN THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY.
2. ON NOTIFICATION THAT AN INVESTMENT HAS BEEN
CERTIFIED, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL TRANSFER AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE
CREDIT AMOUNT STATED IN THE INITIAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR THE
INVESTMENT FROM THE RESERVE FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(III) 1. PERIODICALLY, BUT NOT MORE FREQUENTLY THAN
QUARTERLY, THE DEPARTMENT MAY SUBMIT INVOICES FOR COSTS THAT HAVE
BEEN INCURRED OR ARE ANTICIPATED TO BE INCURRED IN ADMINISTERING THE
TAX CREDIT PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
2. THE COMPTROLLER SHALL TRANSFER MONEY FROM
THE RESERVE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT TO PAY FOR COSTS THAT HAVE BEEN
INCURRED OR ARE ANTICIPATED TO BE INCURRED IN ADMINISTERING THE TAX
CREDIT PROGRAM UNDER THIS SECTION.
(G) (1) THE CREDIT CLAIMED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
RECAPTURED AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF WITHIN 2
YEARS FROM THE CLOSE OF THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE CREDIT IS
CLAIMED:
(I) THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR SELLS, TRANSFERS, OR
OTHERWISE DISPOSES OF THE OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND
COMPANY THAT GAVE RISE TO THE CREDIT; OR
(II) THE QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY THAT GAVE RISE TO
THE CREDIT:
1. CEASES OPERATING AS AN ACTIVE BUSINESS WITH ITS
HEADQUARTERS AND BASE OF OPERATIONS IN THE STATE; OR
2. PAYS OUT AS DIVIDENDS OR OTHERWISE
DISTRIBUTES THE EQUITY INVESTMENT.
(2) THE CREDIT CLAIMED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
RECAPTURED AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF, WITHIN 4
MONTHS OF RECEIVING A QUALIFIED INVESTMENT, A QUALIFIED MARYLAND

SENATE BILL 826
COMPANY IS NOT DULY ORGANIZED AND EXISTING UNDER THE LAWS OF ANY
JURISDICTION FOR THE PURPOSES OF CONDUCTING BUSINESS FOR PROFIT.
(3) THE AMOUNT REQUIRED TO BE RECAPTURED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IS THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT CLAIMED OR, IN THE
CASE OF AN EVENT DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PORTION OF THE CREDIT ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE OWNERSHIP INTEREST DISPOSED
OF; AND
(II) 1. 100%, IF THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE
CREDIT OCCURS DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE TAX CREDIT IS
CLAIMED;
2. 67%, IF THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE
CREDIT OCCURS DURING THE FIRST YEAR AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE TAXABLE YEAR
FOR WHICH THE TAX CREDIT IS CLAIMED; OR
3. 33%, IF THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE
CREDIT OCCURS MORE THAN 1 YEAR BUT NOT MORE THAN 2 YEARS AFTER THE
CLOSE OF THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE TAX CREDIT IS CLAIMED.
(4) THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR THAT CLAIMED THE CREDIT SHALL
PAY THE AMOUNT TO BE RECAPTURED AS DETERMINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION AS TAXES PAYABLE TO THE STATE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IN
WHICH THE EVENT REQUIRING RECAPTURE OF THE CREDIT OCCURS.
(H) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE ITS INITIAL OR FINAL
CERTIFICATION OF AN APPROVED CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION IF ANY
REPRESENTATION MADE IN CONNECTION WITH THE APPLICATION FOR THE
CERTIFICATION IS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO HAVE BEEN FALSE.
(2) THE REVOCATION MAY BE IN FULL OR IN PART AS THE
DEPARTMENT MAY DETERMINE AND, SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, SHALL BE COMMUNICATED TO THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR, THE
QUALIFIED MARYLAND COMPANY, AND THE COMPTROLLER.
(3) THE QUALIFIED INVESTOR SHALL HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO
APPEAL ANY REVOCATION TO THE DEPARTMENT PRIOR TO NOTIFICATION OF THE
COMPTROLLER.

SENATE BILL 826 13
(4) THE COMPTROLLER MAY MAKE AN ASSESSMENT AGAINST THE
QUALIFIED INVESTOR TO RECAPTURE ANY AMOUNT OF TAX CREDIT THAT THE
QUALIFIED INVESTOR HAS ALREADY CLAIMED.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT OUTREACH ABOUT THE TAX
CREDIT ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION TO INCUBATORS, INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION, AND INVESTOR NETWORKS.
(J) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2.5–109 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
ARTICLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE INITIAL TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR.
(K) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE COMPTROLLER JOINTLY SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION AND TO SPECIFY
CRITERIA AND PROCEDURES FOR APPLICATION FOR, APPROVAL OF, AND
MONITORING CONTINUING ELIGIBILITY FOR THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
Chapter 717 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, and unless inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other
federal requirement, or with the terms of a gift or settlement agreement, for fiscal years
2024 through 2028, net interest on all State money allocated by the State Treasurer under
§ 6–226 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to special funds or accounts, and
otherwise entitled to receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall
accrue to the General Fund of the State, with the exception of the following funds:
(54) the [Innovation Investment Fund] ANGEL INVESTOR TAX CREDIT
RESERVE FUND;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, but
before January 1, 2030. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.